Louisiana, session 2026, SB322.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:386 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§386. Apprentice defined; Louisiana Youth Apprentice
A. The term "apprentice" as used in this Chapter is defined as a worker at
least sixteen years of age, except where a higher minimum age standard is otherwise
fixed by law, who is employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation pursuant to the
standards of apprenticeship as provided for in LAC 40:IX.317 in order to fulfill the
requirements of LAC 40:IX.301 and who has entered into a written apprentice
agreement with an employer, an association of employers, or an organization of
employees, providing for a time-based program model with not less than two
thousand hours of reasonably continuous employment, a competency-based program
model, or a hybrid program, and for participation in an approved program of training
through employment and through education in related and supplemental subjects.
B. A Louisiana Youth Apprentice is an apprentice, as provided in
Subsection A of this Section, who meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Is no older than twenty-four years of age.
(2) Has entered into a written registered apprenticeship agreement that
both:
(a) Provides for not less than three hundred seventy-five hours of
reasonably continuous employment.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 322 ENROLLED
(b) Provides for participation in an approved program of training
through paid employment and through education in related and supplemental
subjects that results in a high school diploma or equivalent and an advanced
industry-based credential, certificate of technical studies, or an equivalent or
more advanced credential.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.